North Carolina, session 2025, HB1178.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PERMANENT TEACHER RAISES
SECTION 1.(a) Article 20 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 115C-302.5A. Teacher salary schedules.
*H1178-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers. The salary
schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $4,387
1 $4,467
2 $4,548
3 $4,628
4 $4,708
5 $4,788
6 $4,892
7 $4,989
8 $5,086
9 $5,183
10 $5,280
11 $5,377
12 $5,474
13 $5,570
14 $5,668
15-24 $5,765
25+ $5,987
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal year and ending with the 2032-2033 fiscal year,
the Department of Public Instruction shall raise the monthly amounts for each step of the teacher
salary schedule each fiscal year by three and sixty-seven hundredths percent (3.67%).
(c) Beginning in the 2033-2034 fiscal year and annually thereafter, the Department of
Public Instruction shall raise the monthly amounts for each step of the teacher salary schedule
for each fiscal year by the sum of one plus the 12-month percent change in the second quarter
Employment Cost Index for elementary and secondary school workers as reported by the Federal
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(d) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule. –
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement each month of one hundred dollars
($100.00).
Page 2 House Bill 1178-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are licensed as speech
pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists who are licensed as
audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
(f) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing annual longevity
payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those longevity
payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
(g) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule shall receive an
amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
(h) No later than February 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Department of Public
Instruction shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and publish on
its website the teacher salary schedule developed for the upcoming fiscal year in accordance with
this section and any other enactment of the General Assembly.
(i) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include instructional support
personnel.
"§ 115C-302.5C. Teacher Salary Reserve.
(a) The Teacher Salary Reserve is established as a reserve to be administered by the
Department of Public Instruction for the purpose of providing teacher raises in accordance with
G.S. 115C-302.5A. The Reserve shall consist of monies appropriated from the General Fund to
the Reserve by the General Assembly and any interest accrued to it thereon. The Department
shall only use monies in the Reserve in accordance with the purposes set forth in this section.
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the unacceptable failure of the General
Assembly to timely pass the Current Operations Appropriations Act in recent years, as required
of the General Assembly, it is imperative that the State provide funds for increased teacher
salaries over time, similar to funds provided for opportunity scholarship grants under
G.S. 115C-562.8, as it existed immediately prior to its repeal, to protect against future failures to
pass a Current Operations Appropriations Act. The General Assembly further finds that the
State's continued low pay for teachers represents a strategic threat to the future prosperity of the
House Bill 1178-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
people of this State, and it is therefore imperative that North Carolina reach the average of teacher
salary in the southeastern United States by 2032. Therefore, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each fiscal year to be used for the
purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2026-2027 $825,100,000
2027-2028 $1,048,200,000
2028-2029 $1,271,300,000
2029-2030 $1,494,400,000
2030-2031 $1,717,500,000
2031-2032 $1,940,600,000
2032-2033 $2,163,700,000
For each fiscal year after the 2032-2033 fiscal year, the amount appropriated from the General
Fund to the Reserve shall be increased by the sum of two hundred eighty-three million two
hundred thousand dollars ($283,200,000) over the amount appropriated under this subsection for
the preceding fiscal year. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for
each fiscal year specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the
appropriated amount specified in this subsection for that fiscal year.
"§ 115C-302.6. Supplemental funds for teacher compensation.
(a) Use of Funds. – To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, except as
provided in subsection (g) of this section, the State Board of Education shall allocate funds
pursuant to this section to eligible local school administrative units to provide salary supplements
to teachers and qualifying school administrators in those units. Allocation of salary supplements
among teachers and qualifying school administrators within each eligible local school
administrative unit, including whether a teacher or qualifying school administrator receives a
salary supplement and the amount of the supplement provided to that person, shall be determined
in the discretion of the local board of education of the eligible unit, except that no individual
salary supplement shall exceed the per teacher funding amount awarded to that unit pursuant to
subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Adjusted market value of taxable real property. – A county's assessed taxable
real property value, using the latest available data published by the
Department of Revenue, divided by the county's sales assessment ratio
determined under G.S. 105-289(h).
(2) Composite value. – For each eligible county, the sum of the following:
a. The taxable real property factor multiplied by sixty-five percent
(65%).
b. The median household income factor multiplied by twenty-five
percent (25%).
c. The effective tax rate factor multiplied by ten percent (10%).
(3) County allocation factor. – For each eligible county, the supplement factor for
that county divided by the sum of all supplement factors for the State.
(4) Effective tax rate. – The actual county tax rate multiplied by the most recent
annual sales assessment ratio for that county.
(5) Effective tax rate factor. – For each eligible county, the effective tax rate for
that county divided by the median effective tax rate in the State.
(6) Eligible county. – A county that has an adjusted market value of taxable real
property of less than fifty billion nine hundred million dollars
($50,900,000,000).
(7) Eligible local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit
located in whole or in part in an eligible county.
Page 4 House Bill 1178-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Eligible school. – A public school that is located in an eligible county and
governed by a local school administrative unit.
(9) Maintenance of effort amount. – For each local school administrative unit in
each fiscal year the total non-State funds expended for salary supplements for
teachers in the 2020-2021 fiscal year.
(10) Median household income. – A county's median household income for the
most recent 12 months for which data are available, as that term is used in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(11) Median household income factor. – For each eligible county, the median
household income in the State divided by the median household income for
that county.
(12) Non-State funds. – Any funds held by a local school administrative unit, other
than nonrecurring federal funds received as a result of legislation enacted by
Congress in response to COVID-19, that are not State funds.
(13) Qualifying school administrator. – Any of the following:
a. Assistant principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8).
b. Principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8a).
(14) Supplement factor. – For each eligible county, the composite value multiplied
by the number of State-funded teachers employed in a school in the county
that is governed by a local school administrative unit.
(15) Taxable real property factor. – For each eligible county, the median adjusted
market value of taxable real property in the State divided by the adjusted
market value of taxable real property for that county.
(16) Teacher. – Teachers and instructional support personnel.
(c) Allocation of Funds. – The State Board of Education shall allocate funds for salary
supplements to eligible local school administrative units according to the following procedure:
(1) County allocation. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall determine
a county allocation by multiplying the county allocation factor for that county
by the funding amount appropriated pursuant to this section for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) Per teacher funding amount. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall
determine a per teacher funding amount by dividing the county allocation
amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection by the total
number of State-funded teachers employed in all eligible schools in that
county.
(3) Unit funding amount. – For each eligible local school administrative unit, the
State Board shall determine the funding amount for that unit based on the per
teacher funding amount or amounts for the eligible county or counties where
the unit is located. For each county with an eligible school governed by the
unit, the State Board shall multiply the applicable per teacher funding amount
for that county determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the number of State-funded teachers employed in the eligible school in that
county. If the unit is located in multiple eligible counties, the State Board shall
aggregate those amounts.
(4) Allocation and funding cap. – The State Board shall allocate the amount
determined pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to each eligible local
school administrative unit for each applicable fiscal year, up to a maximum of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per State-funded teacher.
(d) Charter Schools. – Funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction
pursuant to this section shall be subject to the allocation of funds for charter schools described in
G.S. 115C-218.105. The General Assembly encourages charter schools receiving funds pursuant
House Bill 1178-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to this section to provide salary supplements to teachers and qualifying school administrators in
the charter school in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to this Section Only. –
The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental funding to eligible
local school administrative units and is not intended to reflect any measure of the adequacy of
the educational program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not intended to reflect
any commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional supplemental funds for
eligible local school administrative units.
(f) Nonsupplant Requirement. – A local school administrative unit that receives funds
under this section shall use those funds to supplement non-State funds provided for salary
supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators and shall not use any State funds,
including funds received under this section, Section 3.3 of S.L. 2025-89, Section 7A.4 of S.L.
2023-134, or Section 7A.12 of S.L. 2021-180, to supplant non-State funds provided for salary
supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators. For purposes of this section, a
local school administrative unit has supplanted non-State funds if the State Board finds that the
amount of non-State funds expended by the unit for salary supplements was less than ninety-five
percent (95%) of the maintenance of effort amount for the local school administrative unit.
(g) Nonsupplant Enforcement. – The State Board of Education shall not allocate any
funds under this section to a local school administrative unit if it determines that the unit has
supplanted non-State funds in violation of subsection (f) of this section.
(h) Reports. – No later than April 15 of each year funds are provided under this section,
the State Board of Education shall report the following information for the applicable fiscal year
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division:
(1) A list of all eligible counties and eligible local school administrative units.
(2) Funds allocated to each eligible local school administrative unit.
(3) The percentage and amount of teachers and qualifying school administrators
in each eligible local school administrative unit receiving salary supplements.
(4) The average salary supplement amount in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(5) The range of salary supplement amounts in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(6) The effect of the salary supplements on the retention of teachers and
qualifying school administrators in eligible local school administrative units.
(7) The identity of any local school administrative unit that the State Board
determines has supplanted funds."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 3.3 of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 3.3. Notwithstanding subdivisions (5) and (6) of G.S. 143C-5-4(b), during the
period of continuing budget authority that begins July 1, 2025, all of the following apply:
…
(6) Supplemental funds for teacher compensation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
are authorized pursuant to the requirements of Section 7A.4 of S.L. 2023-134,
as amended by Section 1.7B of S.L. 2024-39, notwithstanding any limitation
to the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium."
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year.

PART II. REVISE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AND REDUCE FUNDS FOR THE
OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
Page 6 House Bill 1178-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
…
(3d) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Meets one of the following criteria:
1. Was a student (i) assigned to and attending a public school
full-time pursuant to G.S. 115C-366 or (ii) enrolled full-time
in a Department of Defense Elementary and Secondary School,
established pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 2164 and located in North
Carolina, during the spring semester prior to the school year
for which the student is applying.
2. Received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to the
school year for which the student is applying.
3. Is eligible to enter kindergarten, first grade, or second grade
pursuant to Article 25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age
of 4 on or before April 16 is eligible to attend the following
school year if the principal, or equivalent, of the school in
which the child seeks to enroll finds that the student meets the
requirements established by the Authority pursuant to
G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority with the child's application.
4. Is a child in foster care as defined in G.S. 131D-10.2(9).
5. Is a child whose adoption decree was entered not more than
one year prior to submission of the scholarship grant
application.
6. Is a child whose parent or legal guardian (i) is on full-time duty
status in the active uniformed service of the United States,
including members of the National Guard and Reserve on
active duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 12301, et seq., and
10 U.S.C. § 12401, et seq., or (ii) receives an honorable
discharge as an active duty member from the uniformed service
of the United States within 12 months prior to application.
7. Is a child who meets both of the following:
I. Was enrolled in a nonpublic school that meets the
requirements of Part 1 and Part 2 of this Article during
House Bill 1178-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the spring semester prior to the school year for which
the student is applying.
II. Was enrolled for the entire school year immediately
prior to the school year in which the student enrolled in
the nonpublic school in one of the following:
A. A North Carolina public school.
B. A Department of Defense Elementary and
Secondary School established pursuant to 10
U.S.C. § 2164 and located in North Carolina.
a1. Has not enrolled in a postsecondary institution in a matriculated status
eligible for enrollment for 12 hours of academic credit.
b. Meets one of the following criteria:
1. Resides in a household with an income level not in excess of
two hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the
student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program. The Authority shall not count any distribution from
the estate of a decedent in calculating the income level of the
applicant's household for the purposes of determining
eligibility for a scholarship under this sub-sub-subdivision.
2. Is a child in foster care as defined in G.S. 131D-10.2. The
Authority shall not consider the household income of the foster
parent, as defined in G.S. 131D-10.2, in determining the
eligibility of a foster care child.
(3e) Full-time student. – A student enrolled exclusively in a nonpublic school for
elementary or secondary education whose parents have released the local
school administrative unit the student is eligible to attend under
G.S. 115C-366 of all obligations to educate the eligible student while the
eligible student is receiving a scholarship grant under this Part.
…
(5b) Part-time student. – A student enrolled part-time in a public school and
part-time in a nonpublic school.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. school. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be
made available on the Authority's Web site. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin
awarding scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following
order:according to the following criteria:
(1) Eligible First priority shall be given to eligible students who received a
scholarship grant for the school year prior to the school year for which the
students are applying.applying if those students have applied by March 1.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.After scholarship
grants have been awarded to prior recipients as provided in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, scholarships shall be awarded with remaining funds as
follows:
a. At least fifty percent (50%) of the remaining funds shall be used to
award scholarship grants to eligible students residing in households
Page 8 House Bill 1178-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
with an income level not in excess of the amount required for the
student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program.
b. Any remaining funds shall be used to award scholarship grants to all
other eligible students.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
(a1) Scholarship grants awarded to eligible students residing in households with an income
level not in excess of the amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or
reduced-price lunch program shall be, per year per eligible student, in an amount of up to seven
thousand nine hundred forty-two dollars ($7,942) for full-time students or up to three thousand
nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($3,971) for part-time students. Scholarship grants awarded to
eligible students residing in households with an income level in excess of the amount required
for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program shall be for amounts
of not more than seven thousand one hundred forty-eight dollars ($7,148) for full-time students
or three thousand five hundred seventy-four dollars ($3,574) for part-time students. Tuition and
fees for a nonpublic school may include tuition and fees for books, transportation, equipment, or
other items required by the nonpublic school. No scholarship grant shall exceed the required
tuition and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of that amount, per
year per eligible student, an amount of up to ninety percent (90%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the prior
fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to forty-five
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
(b3) Tuition and fees for a nonpublic school may include tuition and fees for books,
transportation, equipment, or other items required by the nonpublic school.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student, an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, and no scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition
and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
House Bill 1178-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b5) In addition to the amount of the scholarship grant, for any student receiving a
scholarship grant in grades three, eight, or 11, the Authority shall provide to the nonpublic school
an amount equal to the cost of the nationally standardized test required to be administered as
provided in G.S. 115C-562.5.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-562.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
…
2027-2028 $700,000,000$320,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000$305,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000$280,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000$265,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000$250,000,000
For the 2032-2033 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars ($825,000,000)
two hundred thirty-five million dollars ($235,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount
specified in this subsection for that fiscal year.
…."
SECTION 2.(d) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-562.1 and G.S. 115C-562.2, as
amended by subsection (a) of this section, any eligible student who receives a scholarship
pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes in the 2026-2027
school year shall be eligible to receive a scholarship in the 2027-2028 fiscal year. The award
shall be at the same amount the student received in the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 2.(e) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-562.8 and any other provision of law
to the contrary, the unencumbered, nonrecurring funds available for the award of opportunity
scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes at
the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year that would otherwise be carried forward in the 2026-2027
fiscal year pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.8(d)(2) shall be reduced by the sum of one hundred fifty
million dollars ($150,000,000) in nonrecurring funds.
SECTION 2.(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
funds appropriated for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund
Reserve for the award of opportunity scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes in the 2027-2028 fiscal year shall be reduced by the sum
of one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000) in recurring funds.
SECTION 2.(g) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with applications for the award of scholarship grants in the 2027-2028 school year.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 10 House Bill 1178-First Edition